Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3104
Application; contents; board; duties.

(1) All applications for state assistance under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act shall be in writing and shall include a certified copy of the approving action of the governing body of the applicant describing the proposed project for which state assistance is requested and the anticipated financing.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the application shall contain:

(a) A description of the proposed financing of the project, including the estimated principal and interest requirements for the bonds proposed to be issued in connection with the project or the amounts necessary to repay the original investment by the applicant in the project;

(b) Documentation of local financial commitment to support the project, including all public and private resources pledged or committed to the project and including a copy of any operating agreement or lease with substantial users of the eligible sports arena facility;

(c) A map identifying the program area, including any covered property or unbuildable property within the program area or taken into account in adjusting the program area as described in subdivision (19) of section 13-3102;

(d) For applications for a privately owned sports complex subject to voter approval as provided in section 13-3110, a description of the proposed ballot language and anticipated election date for such voter approval if the application is approved; and

(e) Any other project information deemed appropriate by the board.

(3) If the state assistance will be used to provide funding for promotion of the arts and cultural events or for promotion of sporting events, the application shall contain:

(a) A detailed description of the programs contemplated and how such programs will be in furtherance of the applicant's public use or public purpose if such funds are to be expended through one or more private organizations; and

(b) Any other program information deemed appropriate by the board.

(4) Upon receiving an application for state assistance, the board shall review the application and notify the applicant of any additional information needed for a proper evaluation of the application.

(5) Any state assistance received pursuant to the act shall be used only for public purposes, except as provided in section 13-3110 for a privately owned sports complex subject to voter approval.

Laws 2010, LB779, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB884, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB39, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB927, § 8;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 27;

Laws 2024, LB1197, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 53.